Maine, session 132, LD861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §124 is enacted to read:
§124. Post-term employment restrictions; commissioners
1. Definition. As used in this section, "employment" means any full-time or part-time
work performed for compensation and includes, but is not limited to, consulting and
membership on a board.
2. Prohibitions. An individual serving as a commissioner on or appointed to serve as
a commissioner on or after December 15, 2025 may not, until 12 months after the
completion of the commissioner's service in accordance with section 105, subsection 2:
A. Solicit employment with or accept employment from a public utility in the State; or
B. Appear before the commission for compensation in a commission proceeding on
behalf of a person.
3. Penalties. An individual who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed $1,000 per occurrence, payable to the State.
4. Enforcement. The Office of the Attorney General may investigate alleged violations
of this section and bring an action for a violation of this section.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §1715 is enacted to read:
§1715. Post-term employment restrictions
1. Definition. As used in this section, "employment" means any full-time or part-time
work performed for compensation and includes, but is not limited to, consulting and
membership on a board.
2. Certain employment prohibited. An individual serving as the Public Advocate on
or appointed to serve as the Public Advocate on or after December 15, 2025 may not, until
12 months after the completion of the Public Advocate's service in accordance with section
1701, subsection 1-A:
Page 1 - 132LR2150(04)

A. Solicit employment with or accept employment from a public utility in the State; or
B. Appear before the commission for compensation in a commission proceeding on
behalf of a person, other than a state agency or quasi-independent state entity, if that
person was a party to an adjudicatory proceeding in which the Public Advocate was a
party during the Public Advocate's term of service.
3. Penalties. An individual who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed $1,000 per occurrence, payable to the State.
4. Enforcement. The Office of the Attorney General may investigate alleged violations
of this section and bring an action for a violation of this section.
Page 2 - 132LR2150(04)